engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4734 Y 1
SFX 4734 0 නැහැලා .
SFX 4246 Y 1
SFX 4246 0 වැසුම් .
SFX 3726 Y 1
SFX 3726 0 ුක්තිය .
SFX 1565 Y 1
SFX 1565 0 ්වූවා .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 0 කිරි .
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 0 කොට .
SFX 4995 Y 1
SFX 4995 0 කොණ .
SFX 3561 Y 1
SFX 3561 0 ්කරණය .
SFX 2135 Y 1
SFX 2135 0 කාන්ත .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 0 ීම්වලින් .
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 0 කොම .
SFX 914 Y 1
SFX 914 0 නයත් .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 කොළ .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 තකින් .
SFX 1882 Y 1
SFX 1882 0 ියොත් .
SFX 3008 Y 1
SFX 3008 0 ශීලීත්වය .
SFX 4042 Y 1
SFX 4042 0 ාචල් .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 වලිනුත් .
SFX 4870 Y 1
SFX 4870 0 තයක .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 තයට .
SFX 4831 Y 1
SFX 4831 0 තෙත් .
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 0 ්සට .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 ්වලදී .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 භාවයෙන් .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 භූමි .
SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 0 මනින්ම .
SFX 4863 Y 1
SFX 4863 0 තයා .
SFX 2575 Y 1
SFX 2575 0 තයි .
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 0 ්ස් .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 0 ්සා .
SFX 1352 Y 1
SFX 1352 0 තයේ .
SFX 1560 Y 1
SFX 1560 0 ්සි .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 0 ්සේ .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 0 රම් .
SFX 3472 Y 1
SFX 3472 0 ්වුවත් .
SFX 3687 Y 1
SFX 3687 0 ුම්වල .
SFX 3626 Y 1
SFX 3626 0 ෙනතුරු .
SFX 2290 Y 1
SFX 2290 0 ාලෝක .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 රූප .
SFX 2445 Y 1
SFX 2445 0 යනවා .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 වාසීන්ට .
SFX 4904 Y 1
SFX 4904 0 ඩත් .
SFX 3474 Y 1
SFX 3474 0 ්වුණා .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 0 ්වුණු .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 වෙලා .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 0 ්වුණේ .
SFX 1144 Y 1
SFX 1144 0 ියාට .
SFX 3691 Y 1
SFX 3691 0 ුමෙහි .
SFX 3805 Y 1
SFX 3805 0 ියාද .
SFX 2239 Y 1
SFX 2239 0 ියාය .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 ්නියක .
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 0 ියෙහි .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 මන් .
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 0 ීයන .
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 0 මනා .
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 0 ියාව .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 ූවද .
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 0 මනේ .
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 0 රූපයක් .
SFX 3734 Y 1
SFX 3734 0 ීයව .
SFX 1136 Y 1
SFX 1136 0 ුවොත් .
SFX 1592 Y 1
SFX 1592 0 ූවා .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 ූවේ .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 0 හුද .
SFX 3598 Y 1
SFX 3598 0 ේකට .
SFX 4493 Y 1
SFX 4493 0 යයේදී .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 වරයෙක් .
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 0 ුන්ට .
SFX 4355 Y 1
SFX 4355 0 ල්ලයි .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 වරයෙකි .
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 වරයෙකු .
SFX 4567 Y 1
SFX 4567 0 මාද .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 මාන .
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 0 ුමින් .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 ‍ය .
SFX 1082 Y 1
SFX 1082 0 ‍ර .
SFX 1130 Y 1
SFX 1130 0 ්නෙක් .
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 0 ්නෙකි .
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 0 ්නෙකු .
SFX 3203 Y 1
SFX 3203 0 මාව .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 0 ාරත්න .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 ්නක් .
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 0 ්නකි .
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 0 ්නකු .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 0 ාත් .
SFX 4843 Y 1
SFX 4843 0 තිවලට .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 බිමට .
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 0 මාවේ .
SFX 4219 Y 1
SFX 4219 0 වුමක් .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 0 වාදයට .
SFX 4147 Y 1
SFX 4147 0 සීමෙන් .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 බිම් .
SFX 4821 Y 1
SFX 4821 0 ත්වලින් .
SFX 4121 Y 1
SFX 4121 0 ස්ථානයෙහි .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 බිමේ .
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 0 වාදයේ .
SFX 4607 Y 1
SFX 4607 0 බසින .
SFX 4722 Y 1
SFX 4722 0 නුවකු .
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 0 ලෙන් .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 යාටත් .
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 0 ුවෙහි .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 කයක් .
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 0 බවත් .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 කයකු .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 ුණට .
SFX 4751 Y 1
SFX 4751 0 ධිකරණ .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 ුණද .
SFX 2433 Y 1
SFX 2433 0 රණයක් .
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 0 ගත්තා .
SFX 4466 Y 1
SFX 4466 0 යෙමි .
SFX 2010 Y 1
SFX 2010 0 යෙමු .
SFX 4343 Y 1
SFX 4343 0 වතකු .
SFX 3403 Y 1
SFX 3403 0 ගත්තෙ .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 ගත්තේ .
SFX 4975 Y 1
SFX 4975 0 ගත්තෝ .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 ුණහ .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 0 ුණා .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 ුණි .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 ුණු .
SFX 2768 Y 1
SFX 2768 0 ුණූ .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 ුණෙ .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 ුණේ .
SFX 4737 Y 1
SFX 4737 0 නායකට .
SFX 4807 Y 1
SFX 4807 0 දරය .
SFX 2773 Y 1
SFX 2773 0 ුකම් .
SFX 2977 Y 1
SFX 2977 0 සුමට .
SFX 2075 Y 1
SFX 2075 0 දරා .
SFX 4890 Y 1
SFX 4890 0 ණාත්මක .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 දරු .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 හමාරක .
SFX 4199 Y 1
SFX 4199 0 වේදීය .
SFX 2775 Y 1
SFX 2775 0 ීස් .
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 0 ්නේදැයි .
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 0 සුම් .
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 0 සුමේ .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 0 ලකට .
SFX 4690 Y 1
SFX 4690 0 න්නයි .
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 0 ාවලියෙන් .
SFX 1674 Y 1
SFX 1674 0 වරුනට .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 ටුව .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 ලක් .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 ්වලින් .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 ලකි .
SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 0 ්වලිනි .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 0 දෙන .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 වරුන් .
SFX 4803 Y 1
SFX 4803 0 දාටත් .
SFX 4302 Y 1
SFX 4302 0 වරුනි .
SFX 4005 Y 1
SFX 4005 0 ාන්තයන් .
SFX 3987 Y 1
SFX 3987 0 ාරයක් .
SFX 2242 Y 1
SFX 2242 0 ියනට .
SFX 4004 Y 1
SFX 4004 0 ාන්තයන්හි .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 ්‍ය .
SFX 1569 Y 1
SFX 1569 0 ්‍ර .
SFX 3456 Y 1
SFX 3456 0 කඩේ .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 ියන් .
SFX 4250 Y 1
SFX 4250 0 වැසියකු .
SFX 3535 Y 1
SFX 3535 0 ්දට .
SFX 4798 Y 1
SFX 4798 0 දාවක .
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 0 ්දර .
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 0 යකුත් .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 ්දා .
SFX 3530 Y 1
SFX 3530 0 ්දි .
SFX 1807 Y 1
SFX 1807 0 ්දී .
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 0 වයෙන් .
SFX 2677 Y 1
SFX 2677 0 ්දු .
SFX 3529 Y 1
SFX 3529 0 ්දෙ .
SFX 1231 Y 1
SFX 1231 0 ්දේ .
SFX 3527 Y 1
SFX 3527 0 ්දෝ .
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 0 තියෙන් .
SFX 1989 Y 1
SFX 1989 0 ලාභීන් .
SFX 2936 Y 1
SFX 2936 0 ාගාරවලින් .
SFX 1633 Y 1
SFX 1633 0 ිච්චි .
SFX 2267 Y 1
SFX 2267 0 ිකයනට .
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 0 කයින්ගේ .
SFX 3896 Y 1
SFX 3896 0 ිකත්වයක් .
SFX 2997 Y 1
SFX 2997 0 සම්පන්න .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 ිකයන් .
SFX 3250 Y 1
SFX 3250 0 පතිවරයාගේ .
SFX 380 Y 1
SFX 380 0 යින්ට .
SFX 3167 Y 1
SFX 3167 0 යින්ද .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 යින්ය .
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 0 ිකයාට .
SFX 1065 Y 1
SFX 1065 0 වරියක .
SFX 4303 Y 1
SFX 4303 0 වරියට .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 ානයන් .
SFX 2559 Y 1
SFX 2559 0 දට .
SFX 1733 Y 1
SFX 1733 0 නෙමි .
SFX 1518 Y 1
SFX 1518 0 දන .
SFX 2515 Y 1
SFX 2515 0 නෙමු .
SFX 2557 Y 1
SFX 2557 0 දම .
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 0 දය .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 දර .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 0 ගෙනුත් .
SFX 3337 Y 1
SFX 3337 0 දල .
SFX 1928 Y 1
SFX 1928 0 හුණු .
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 0 ද් .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 දා .
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 0 දැ .
SFX 4794 Y 1
SFX 4794 0 දෑ .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 දි .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 දී .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 0 දු .
SFX 4305 Y 1
SFX 4305 0 වරයෙකුට .
SFX 2542 Y 1
SFX 2542 0 දෙ .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 0 දේ .
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 0 දෝ .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 ියගේ .
SFX 4642 Y 1
SFX 4642 0 පාණෝ .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 ිවෙනවා .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 වලටත් .
SFX 2628 Y 1
SFX 2628 0 කාරිත්වයට .
SFX 4392 Y 1
SFX 4392 0 ලයයි .
SFX 4833 Y 1
SFX 4833 0 තුවෙන් .
SFX 4590 Y 1
SFX 4590 0 මගේ .
SFX 1839 Y 1
SFX 1839 0 ෙක්ද .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 නේද .
SFX 3428 Y 1
SFX 3428 0 කාරිත්වයේ .
SFX 4713 Y 1
SFX 4713 0 නේම .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 0 නේය .
SFX 4538 Y 1
SFX 4538 0 මෙට .
SFX 3826 Y 1
SFX 3826 0 ිමයි .
SFX 3278 Y 1
SFX 3278 0 නේ් .
SFX 4000 Y 1
SFX 4000 0 ාභරණ .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 ්නන්ගේ .
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 0 කරුවනට .
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 0 ්වීමෙන් .
SFX 4128 Y 1
SFX 4128 0 සේනට .
SFX 4478 Y 1
SFX 4478 0 යිනුත් .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 කරුවන් .
SFX 4278 Y 1
SFX 4278 0 වාගැනීම .
SFX 2276 Y 1
SFX 2276 0 ැල් .
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 0 ැලි .
SFX 3829 Y 1
SFX 3829 0 ිපත් .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 ේෂ් .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 කිරීම .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 තාවකින් .
SFX 1366 Y 1
SFX 1366 0 කරුවාට .
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 0 ාගැන්ම .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 පිටිය .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 ටින් .
SFX 3459 Y 1
SFX 3459 0 ංකර .
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 0 ශයකට .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 ාවකට .
SFX 3889 Y 1
SFX 3889 0 ිකයින්ට .
SFX 3967 Y 1
SFX 3967 0 ාවකම .
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 0 ියැයි .
SFX 3013 Y 1
SFX 3013 0 ශයක් .
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 0 ාවක් .
SFX 690 Y 1
SFX 690 0 ාවකි .
SFX 2338 Y 1
SFX 2338 0 සීමක් .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 තාවන්ට .
SFX 4203 Y 1
SFX 4203 0 වේදියාගේ .
SFX 3135 Y 1
SFX 3135 0 රුත් .
SFX 1191 Y 1
SFX 1191 0 පතිවරයා .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 0 කාරීන් .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 ්‍යයෙන් .
SFX 3114 Y 1
SFX 3114 0 ලිවලින් .
