engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.dic
උදාව/1,2,5,16,24,33,41,52,59,80,83,88,107,109,111,160,195,209,222,289,303,327,328,374,449,460,476,920,1022,1242,1584,2190,3305,3626
කාර්ය/1,3,4,9,14,15,19,23,27,29,36,40,42,44,56,64,68,74,210,240,324,394,504,658,957,1155,1326,1420,1640,1716,1925,1926,2293,2309,2898,2945,3972,3973,3974,3975,4054,4491,4493,4586,4587,4597
කිව/11,24,83,132,208,291,908,1026,1143,2733,2790,3830,4582
ගිණි/3,3221,4995
ගෝල/3,6,14,15,19,23,27,40,52,78,119,128,129,154,232,339,538,601,1090,1188,1261,1578,2168,2264,2685,2778,3734
ජනපද/3,14,15,19,23,26,56,68,171,560,1276,2369
ජීවිතේට/4580
ජීවී/2956
දම්/66,343,781,1700,2035,2465,4558
දයා/9,10,34,38,39,58,97,118,151,172,343,352,359,413,455,519,542,567,787,1184,2076,2135,2350,3259,4351,4449,4450
දැල/1,2,4,6,8,16,17,21,101,110,156,410,550,715,815,816,1224,1225,1373,1564,1565,1566,2150,2646,3490
දෙති/97,2576,2759
දෙවන/5,16,24,65,208,299,449,724,1472,2009,2187,2278,3728,3938,4460
නව්/663
නොලැබ/2,41,52,59,83,107,111,120,122,160,209,222,229,243,277,289,307,315,374,378,449,460,476,768,770,1136,1394,1584,1824,1843,2185,2216,2221
නොහැර/41,59,80,186,1882
පත්ව/2,24,33,41,42,52,57,59,80,83,88,106,107,109,111,120,122,155,160,165,192,195,209,212,222,229,238,243,270,277,289,303,304,307,327,328,341,449,476,497,576,596,624,686,720,766,768,770,820,920,1248,1250,1254,1335,1592,1612,1843,1865,1867,2195,2196,2197,2249,2713,2718,2729,3305,3743,4687
පවිත්‍ර/20,138,142,646,1220,1519,1526,2606
පසුව/1,3,5,11,13,33,34,41,52,59,80,83,88,107,109,111,122,160,208,229,241,265,270,278,289,327,328,476,556,576,610,768,920,1592,2507,3331
පහු/10,159,196,459,648,1452
පාත/6,16,503,1328,1382,1563,3474
පාලි/4863
පැමිණ/2,16,52,59,63,80,86,107,111,122,130,144,148,160,186,195,222,229,238,289,292,307,315,327,341,342,374,476,485,497,518,576,578,580,596,770,883,1036,1143,1144,1248,1265,1739,1877,1878,2010,2184,2190,2231,2232,2239,2240,2249,2440,2715,2797,2804,2809,3826,3849
පුරුක/4,1223
පෙදෙස/1,2,4,6,7,8,17,18,21,25,32,36,89,101,105,110,156,227,444,674
බැස/52,61,113,243,300,387,459,650,948,1223,1801,2147,2645,3785
මිනිස්/1717,3411,3705
මුල්/648,864,927,1008,1121,1302,1333,1780,2083,2124,2567,2624,3225
මුළු/39,58,183,503,1073,1207,2611,3211,4354,4367,4581,4731
මෙවුන්/1203,4734
යෙදෙන/551,574,979,1019,1020,1071,2672,3521,3522
රසද/951
රාජස්ථාන්/976
රැස/1,2,4,6,11,17,18,21,25,28,87,89,181,190,242,313,392,393,445,550,617,651,813,814,926,936,1128,1224,1225,1236,1237,1557,1558,1563,1814,2150,2649,3471,3560
රියන/1560
ලතා/38,58,66,127,1694,1947
ලාභ/3,13,14,16,19,23,41,56,71,334,342,405,470,704,881,917,1202,1266,2253,2309,3750,3801,3805
වගේ/7,11,131,139,1543
වයි/9,97,432,454,1363,1444,1700,1767,2592
වාස/3,6,16,19,23,24,41,52,57,106,124,169,175,176,187,281,334,531,558,583,598,827,881,966,1035,1162,1177,1289,1339,1437,1574,1613,1899,2055,2056,2243,2246,2327,2473,3218,3290,3291,3816,4735,4965
වාහන/2,3,8,11,13,14,15,19,23,26,29,31,40,44,48,55,71,133,528,3598
වැසී/416,459,645,2445,3654
විකාශ/3,14,19,23,33,225,335,417,456,914
විම/1,4,6,33,57,62,169,491,632,644,657,833,969,1291,1419,1443,1524,1756,1934,1941,2304,2331,2866,2867,3726,3727,3907,3908,3909,3910,4154
විහිද/2,16,20,41,111,120,136,160,221,229,243,280,315,374,377,556,595,667,1597,1851,2742,3735
සංවිධාන/2,3,11,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,40,44,48,55,68,71,74,94,121,189,210,240,255,308,465,537,697,740,887,925,2377
සද්/1489,1509
සභාපති/75,189,206,350,352,468,501,605,643,976,1104,1171,1301,1744,2060,2379,3067
සැලසුම/11,13,17,21,101,110,347,651,874,1236,1816,2173,3561
සිදුව/2,24,33,41,52,83,88,109,111,120,155,160,166,192,195,208,209,229,241,243,276,277,289,303,304,315,327,328,374,378,449,460,476,531,554,624,666,668,720,765,768,853,854,943,1022,1135,1248,1250,1335,1592,1824,1834,1843,2195,2216,2225,2506,2729,2730,3263,3645,3754
සිද්ධ/194,196,367,487,506,779,959,2290,3442
සුහද/10,159,310,891,1554,1657,3008
සෙවන/1,4,17,714,1153,1267,1278,2187
හස්ත/3,11,14,16,18,19,48,334,726,1035,1038,1144
හිම/2,6,15,498,957,1420,4042
හිස්/1329,2567,4246,4600
හොර/1,8,16,17,20,24,89,112,123,159,161,247,257,301,424,655,945,1766,2761,3229,3369,3386
